Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2440.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 31-281, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE31-281. Transition program; report; definition A. The department shall establish a transition program that provides eligible inmates with transition services in the community for up to not more than ninety days. The department shall administer the transition program and contract with private or nonprofit entities to provide eligible inmates with transition services and shall procure transition services pursuant to title 41, chapter 23. B. The director shall adopt rules to implement this article. The rules shall include: 1. Eligibility criteria for receiving a contracted entity's transition services.  To be eligible, at a minimum, an inmate shall: (a) Not have been convicted of a sexual offense pursuant to title 13, chapter 14 or a violation of title 13, chapter 17. (b) Not have been convicted of a violent crime as defined in section 13-901.03, unless the inmate was convicted of assault, aggravated assault or robbery. (c) Not have any felony detainers. (d) Agree in writing to provide specific information after the inmate is released. The department shall use the information to prepare the report prescribed by subsection D, paragraph 3 of this section. (e) Have made satisfactory progress by complying with all programming on the inmate's individualized corrections plan as determined by the department. (f) Be classified by the department as minimum or medium custody as determined by an objective risk assessment. (g) Not have been found in violation of any major violent rule during the inmate's current period of incarceration or in violation of any other major rule within the previous six months. For the purposes of this subdivision, an accumulation of minor rule violations does not equal a major rule violation. 2. A requirement that each contracted entity train mentors or certify that mentors are trained. 3. A requirement that the services offered to an inmate include psychoeducational counseling and case management services as determined by the department. The counseling and services may include substance abuse treatment, anger management, cognitive behavioral therapy, parenting skills and family reunification training, further education and job placement. 4. A requirement that an inmate may be released pursuant to this article only after the victim has been provided notice and an opportunity to be heard. The department shall provide notice to a victim who has provided a current address or other contact information. The notice shall inform the victim of the opportunity to be heard on the early release. Any objection to the inmate's early release must be made within twenty days after the department has mailed the notice to the victim. C. In awarding contracts under this section the department shall comply with section 41-3751. D. The department shall: 1. Conduct an annual study to determine the recidivism rate of inmates who receive a contracted entity's services pursuant to this article. The study shall include the recidivism rate of inmates who have been released from incarceration for a minimum of three years after release. 2. Evaluate the inmate and provide the information to the contracted entity. 3. Submit a written report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives on or before July 31 of each year and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. The report may be submitted electronically. The report shall contain the following information: (a) The recidivism rate of inmates who receive services pursuant to this article, including the recidivism rate of inmates who have been released from incarceration for a minimum of three years after release. (b) The number of inmates who received services pursuant to this article. (c) The number of inmates who were not provided services pursuant to this article and who were on a list waiting to receive services. (d) The types of services provided. (e) The number of inmates who received each type of service provided. 4. Provide information about the transition program to all inmates who are not serving a life sentence on admission to prison and to any inmate who is potentially eligible for the transition program six months before the inmate's eligibility date.  The information must include all of the admission requirements to the transition program, including the disqualifying factors under this section. E. Notwithstanding subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section, if an inmate agrees to comply with any condition that is established and required by section 41-1604.07, subsection F, has been convicted of the possession or use of marijuana pursuant to section 13-3405, subsection A, paragraph 1, possession or use of a dangerous drug pursuant to section 13-3407, subsection A, paragraph 1, possession or use of a narcotic drug pursuant to section 13-3408, subsection A, paragraph 1 or possession or use of drug paraphernalia pursuant to section 13-3415, subsection A and is not concurrently serving another sentence for an offense that is not listed in this subsection, the inmate is eligible for and shall be released to enter the transition program.  The director may not exclude an inmate who is eligible for the transition program pursuant to this subsection because the inmate does not have a place to reside before being released, except that the director shall exclude an inmate who has any of the following: 1. Previously been convicted of a violent crime as defined in section 13-901.03 or an offense listed in title 13, chapter 14 or 35.1. 2. A felony detainer. 3. Been found to be in violation of a major violent rule during the inmate's current period of incarceration or to be in violation of any other major rule within the previous six months.  For the purposes of this paragraph, an accumulation of minor rule violations does not equal a major rule violation. 4. Previously been released pursuant to this section and violated a term of the inmate's release. 5. Failed to achieve functional literacy as required by section 41-1604.07, subsection F, unless the inmate is enrolled in a program that prepares the inmate to achieve functional literacy. 6. Been classified by the department as close or maximum custody as determined by a current and objective risk assessment. 7. Refused enrollment in or been removed for poor behavior from a major self-improvement program within the previous eighteen months unless the inmate has subsequently enrolled in and completed the major self-improvement program. F. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, the department may grant a onetime extension of up to an additional ninety days for an eligible inmate to continue receiving transition services if all of the following apply: 1. the department determines that the inmate will need additional treatment or intervention to adequately address the inmate's specific criminogenic needs. 2. the contracted entity that is providing the inmate's transition services uses an empirically validated, peer-reviewed instrument to evaluate the inmate's risk of recidivism and identifies the inmate's primary criminogenic factors. 3. the contracted entity that evaluates the inmate pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection submits an updated individualized service plan to the department. F. G. For the purposes of this section, "recidivism" means reincarceration in the department for any reason. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.